Utah statutes.
63G-9-305.   Publication of abstract of claims allowed and rejected.
The board must make up its report and recommendations at least 30 days before
the meeting of the Legislature; and a brief abstract of the report, showing
the claims rejected, and those allowed and the amounts thereof, must be
published in a newspaper published at the seat of government before the
meeting of the Legislature for such time as the board may prescribe.
